Maine, session 132, LD2221.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 12 MRSA §10157, sub-§1-A, as amended by PL 2023, c. 405, Pt. A, §28,
is further amended to read:
1-A. Appointment and composition. The Landowners and Land Users Relations
Advisory Board, referred to in this chapter as "the advisory board" and established by Title
5, section 12004‑I, subsection 49‑C, consists of the following 18 members:
A. Eleven Thirteen voting members, appointed by the Commissioner of Inland
Fisheries and Wildlife:
(1) One representative of a statewide small woodland owners association;
(2) One representative of a large landowners association;
(3) One representative of a statewide farmers organization;
(4) Three representatives who hunt, fish or trap;
(5) Two Three representatives of outdoor recreationists, including one
representative of an all-terrain vehicle club, one representative of a snowmobile
club and one representative of a nonmotorized recreation industry with a focus on
hiking, wildlife watching, biking, paddling, trail running or other popular outdoor
pursuits;
(6) Two representatives of environmentalist organizations; and
(7) One representative of land trust organizations.; and
(8) One representative of an organization managing recreational access to the
North Maine Woods; and
B. Five nonvoting members:
(1) Two representatives of the Bureau of Warden Service, designated by the
Commissioner of Inland Fisheries and Wildlife;
Page 1 - 132LR3059(03)

(2) One representative of the Department of Economic and Community
Development, designated by the Commissioner of Economic and Community
Development; and
(3) Two representatives of the Department of Agriculture, Conservation and
Forestry, designated by the Commissioner of Agriculture, Conservation and
Forestry.
Page 2 - 132LR3059(03)